Hawaii statutes.
§132D-8 Application for license. (a)
All licenses required under section 132D-7 shall be issued by the county and
shall be nontransferable. Licenses to import shall specify the date of
issuance or effect and the date of expiration, which shall be March 31 of each
year. The application shall be made on a form setting forth the date upon
which the importations are to begin, the address of the location of the
importer, and the name of the proprietor or, if a partnership, the name of the
partnership and the names of all partners or, if a corporation, the name of the
corporation and the names of its officers. The application for a license to
import display fireworks, articles pyrotechnic, or aerial devices shall include
written documentation of the proposed display event and related contact
information in a form prescribed by the applicable county. If the state fire
council or county discovers at a later date that a licensee has been convicted
of a felony under this chapter, the licensee's license shall be revoked and no
new license shall be issued to the licensee for two years.

(b) Each storage, wholesaling, and retailing
site shall be required to obtain a separate license. The license shall specify
the date of issuance or effect and the date of expiration, which shall be March
31 of each year. The application shall be made on a form setting forth the
date upon which the storage, sale, or offers for sale are to begin, the address
of the location of the licensee, and the name of the proprietor, or, if a partnership,
the name of the partnership and the names of all partners or, if a corporation,
the name of the corporation and the name of its officers. Any license issued
pursuant to this chapter may be revoked by the county if the licensee violates
any provision of this chapter or if the licensee stores or handles the
fireworks in such a manner as to present an unreasonable safety hazard.

(c) Permanent and temporary fireworks storage
buildings or structures and buildings or facilities where redistribution
activities are performed shall comply with the currently adopted county
building or fire codes or the latest edition of nationally recognized
standards.

(d) It shall be unlawful for any licensee,
other than a wholesaler who is selling or transferring fireworks or articles
pyrotechnic to a licensed retailer, to sell or offer to sell, exchange for
consideration, give, transfer, or donate any fireworks or articles pyrotechnic
at any time to any person who does not present a permit duly issued as required
by section 132D-10 or 132D-16. The permit shall be signed by the seller or
transferor at the time of sale or transfer of the fireworks or articles
pyrotechnic, and the seller or transferor shall indicate on the permit the
amount and type of fireworks or articles pyrotechnic sold or transferred. No
person shall sell or deliver fireworks to any permittee in any amount in excess
of the amount specified in the permit, less the amount shown on the permit to
have been previously purchased; provided that no fireworks shall be sold to a
permittee holding a permit issued for purposes of section 132D-3, more than
five calendar days before the applicable time period under section 132D-3.

(e) Aerial devices, display fireworks, or
articles pyrotechnic shall only be sold or transferred by a wholesaler to a
person with a valid permit under sections 132D-10 and 132D-16. No person with
a valid permit under sections 132D-10 and 132D-16 shall sell or transfer aerial
devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic to any other person.

(f) Any license issued pursuant to this
chapter shall be prominently displayed in public view at each licensed
location. [L 1994, c 180, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 233, §8; am L 2006, c 183, §8;
am L 2011, c 127, §4; am L 2014, c 11, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next